Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7285.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-15. Terms and conditions of rental agreement.
(a) A landlord and a tenant may include in a rental agreement terms and conditions not
prohibited by this chapter or other rule of law, including rent, term of the agreement, and other
provisions governing the rights and obligations of the parties.
(1) If there are fees beyond the rent that apply to the rental of a unit, the lease shall disclose
those fees in the same section as the rent disclosure and shall indicate that additional fees may
apply. This requirement does not apply whenever the tenant or unit are receiving state or federal
subsidies that require a different lease format.
(2) If there is no written lease, the landlord shall provide to the tenant, in writing, a list of
all fees beyond the rent that apply to the rental of the unit. Any change in required fees must be
disclosed in writing at least thirty (30) days prior to the change becoming effective.
(3) In any lease agreement the landlord shall disclose which utility costs are included in
the rent and which utility costs are the tenant’s responsibility. If there is no written lease, the
landlord shall provide this information to the tenant in writing.
(4) If a tenant is required to obtain renters insurance, this requirement must be stated in the
lease or if there is no written lease the landlord shall provide this information to the tenant in
writing.

(5) If a landlord fails to comply with subsections (a)(1) — (a)(4) of this section, the tenant
may recover any fees paid for the unit that were not disclosed as required.
(b) In absence of agreement, the tenant shall pay as rent the fair rental value for the use and
occupancy of the dwelling unit.
(c) Rent is payable without demand or notice at the time and place agreed upon by the
parties. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the dwelling unit and periodic rent is payable at
the beginning of any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal monthly installments at the
beginning of each month. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is uniformly apportionable from day-to-
day.
(d) Unless the rental agreement fixes a definite term, the tenancy is week-to-week in case
of a roomer who pays weekly rent, and in all other cases month to month.
(e) A tenant who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older or who will turn sixty-five (65)
during the term of a rental agreement for a dwelling unit may terminate such a rental agreement in
order to enter a residential care and assisted living facility, as defined in § 23-17.4-2, a nursing
facility, or a unit in a private or public housing complex designated by the federal government as
housing for the elderly. The tenant may terminate the rental agreement by notice given in writing
to the usual person to whom rental payments are made. The notice shall be accompanied by
documentation of admission or pending admission to a facility or housing complex described in
this section. Termination of the rental agreement shall be effective no earlier than forty-five (45)
days after the first rental payment due date following delivery of written notice of termination.
(f)(1) A lease of premises occupied, or intended to be occupied, by a servicemember or a
servicemember’s dependents may be unilaterally terminated if:
(i) The lease is executed by or on behalf of a person who, thereafter, and during the term
of the lease, enters military service; or
(ii) The servicemember, while in military service, executes the lease and thereafter receives
military orders for a change of permanent station or to deploy with a military unit, or as an
individual in support of a military operation, for a period of not less than ninety (90) days; and
(iii) The lessee delivers to the lessor (or the lessor’s grantee), or to the lessor’s agent (or
the agent’s grantee), written notice of the termination, and a copy of the servicemember’s military
orders.
(2) Effective date of lease termination. In the event that a lease provides for monthly
payment of rent, termination of the lease under this section is effective thirty (30) days after the
first date on which the next rental payment is due and payable after the date on which the notice is
delivered.
LC003958 - Page 2 of 4

(3) In the case of any other lease, termination of the lease is effective on the last day of the
month following the month in which the notice is delivered.
(4) The lessee shall be responsible for rent amounts of the lease that are unpaid for the
period preceding the effective date of the lease termination on a prorated basis. The lessor may not
impose an early termination charge, but any taxes, summonses, or other obligations and liabilities
of the lessee in accordance with the terms of the lease, including reasonable charges to the lessee
for excess wear, that are due and unpaid at the time of termination of the lease, shall be paid by the
lessee.
(5) Rent paid in advance. Rents or lease amounts paid in advance for a period after the
effective date of the termination of the lease shall be refunded to the lessee by the lessor (or the
lessor’s assignee or the assignee’s agent) within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the
termination of the lease.
(6) A lessee’s termination of a lease pursuant to this section shall terminate any obligation
a dependent of the lessee may have under the lease.
(g)(1) Effective January 1, 2027, upon the execution or renewal of any written lease
agreement of a mobile and manufactured home, as defined in § 31-44-1, located in a mobile and
manufactured home park as defined in 31-44-1, pursuant to this chapter, the landlord shall provide
the tenant with a complete copy of the signed lease, including all pages, addenda, and any
attachments incorporated into the lease within ten (10) days of execution.
(2) Failure by the landlord to provide the tenant with a complete copy of the lease
agreement shall constitute a violation of this chapter, and the tenant may seek remedies in the
appropriate court or through administrative complaint.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a "complete copy" means the entire lease document as
signed by both parties, including any written rules, regulations, addenda, disclosures, or notices
referenced in the lease.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003958
========
LC003958 - Page 3 of 4